Hawaii, session 2026, HB580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 712-1243, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§712-1243  Promoting a dangerous drug in the third degree.  (1)  A person commits the offense of promoting a dangerous drug in the third degree if the person knowingly possesses any dangerous drug in any amount. (2) Promoting a dangerous drug in the third degree is a class C felony[.]; provided that, notwithstanding sections 706‑660 and 706-669 and any other law to the contrary: (a)  If a person is convicted pursuant to this section and methamphetamine or fentanyl is the drug upon which the conviction is predicated, the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment shall be not less than one year and not greater than two years; (b)  If a person has one prior conviction for methamphetamine or fentanyl possession pursuant to this section; promoting a dangerous drug in the first degree pursuant to section 712-1241 and methamphetamine or fentanyl was the drug upon which the conviction was predicated; or section 712-1240.8, as that section was in effect prior to July 1, 2016, the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment shall be not less than two years and not greater than four years; (c)  If a person has two prior convictions for methamphetamine or fentanyl possession pursuant to this section; promoting a dangerous drug in the first degree pursuant to section 712-1241 and methamphetamine or fentanyl was the drug upon which the conviction was predicated; or section 712-1240.8, as that section was in effect prior to July 1, 2016, the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment shall be not less than five years and not greater than eight years; and (d)  If a person has three or more prior convictions for methamphetamine or fentanyl possession pursuant to this section; promoting a dangerous drug in the first degree pursuant to section 712-1241 and methamphetamine or fentanyl was the drug upon which the conviction was predicated; or section 712-1240.8, as that section was in effect prior to July 1, 2016, the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment shall be ten years." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________